Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-903
Rule 903. Subscribing witness testimony; when necessary.

The testimony of a subscribing witness is not necessary to authenticate a writing unless required by the laws of the jurisdiction whose laws govern the validity of the writing.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 63.